Louisiana, session 2026, HB452.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1008.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1008.1. Health coverage plans; vaccination; prohibited provider incentives
A. A health coverage plan shall not pay or offer to pay to any healthcare
provider an incentive, bonus, or other amount beyond the contracted reimbursement
rate for a covered healthcare service with the intent to, directly or indirectly,
influence, persuade, or encourage the healthcare provider to administer any
vaccination.
B. A health coverage plan shall not deny or otherwise refuse to reimburse
any claim for a covered healthcare service submitted by a healthcare provider or
impose any other penalty on a healthcare provider with the intent to, directly or
indirectly, influence, persuade, or encourage the healthcare provider to administer
any vaccination.
C. For purposes of this Section, "health coverage plan" means any hospital,
health, or medical expense insurance policy, hospital or medical service contract,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 452
employee welfare benefit plan, contract, or other agreement with a health
maintenance organization or a preferred provider organization, health and accident
insurance policy, or any other insurance contract of this type in this state, including
a group insurance plan, a self-insurance plan, and the Office of Group Benefits
programs. "Health coverage plan" does not include a plan providing coverage for
excepted benefits as defined in R.S. 22:1061, limited benefit health insurance plans,
and short-term policies that have a term of less than twelve months.